Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3322
Legal service insurance corporation; affairs; transactions; examination.

The Department of Insurance may appoint any deputy or examiner or other persons who shall have the power of visitation and examination into the affairs of any corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313. Such deputy or examiner shall have free access to all the books, papers, and documents that relate to the business of the corporation, and may summon and qualify witnesses under oath to examine its officers, agents, or employees or other persons in relation to the affairs, transactions, and condition of such corporation.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 22.